Maryland, session 2025, HB0083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–228.
(g) (1) (i) [Beginning on February 1, 1992,] THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ESTABLISH a tire recycling fee [shall] TO be imposed on the first sale of a new tire in the
State by a tire dealer, including new tires sold as part of a new or used vehicle, trailer, farm
implement, or other similar machinery.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0083*

HOUSE BILL 83
(ii) A county, municipal corporation, or any agency of a county or
municipal corporation may not impose any tax, fee, or other charge on the first sale of a
new tire by a tire dealer.
(2) The tire recycling fee:
(I) SHALL BE SET AT $1 PER TIRE BEGINNING JANUARY 1,
2026;
(II) SUBJECT TO ITEM (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, MAY BE
ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION EVERY 2 FISCAL YEARS BASED ON THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
[(i)] (III) May not exceed [$1.00] $2 per tire[; and
(ii) Shall be established by the Board of Public Works].
(3) For a sale made by a tire dealer to a person who resells tires, the tire
dealer shall separately state its recycling fees paid by the tire dealer on the invoice or other
document of sale.
(4) (i) Each tire dealer shall:
1. Pay the tire recycling fee; and
2. Complete and submit, under oath, a return and remit the
fees to the Comptroller of the Treasury on or before the 21st day of the month that follows
the month in which the sale was made, and for other periods and on other dates that the
Comptroller specifies by regulation, including periods for which no fees were due.
(ii) For periods beginning after December 31, 2026, a person shall
file a tire recycling fee return electronically.
(5) A tire dealer who timely files a tire recycling fee return and pays the
tire recycling fees due is allowed, for the expense of administering and paying the fee, a
credit equal to 0.6% of the gross amount of tire recycling fees that the tire dealer is to pay
to the Comptroller.
(6) If the amount of the tire recycling fee is separately stated in a retail
sale, the tire recycling fee is not subject to any tax under Title 11 of the Tax – General
Article or Title 13 of the Transportation Article.
(7) At the end of each quarter, the Comptroller shall forward all tire
recycling fees to the Used Tire Cleanup and Recycling Fund, less the costs of
administration.

HOUSE BILL 83 3
(8) Except to the extent they are inconsistent with this subsection, the
provisions of Title 13 of the Tax – General Article applicable to the sales and use tax shall
govern the administration, collection, and enforcement of the tire recycling fee under this
subsection.
(9) The Comptroller:
(i) Shall administer the tire recycling fee; and
(ii) May adopt any regulations that are necessary or appropriate to
administer, collect, and enforce the tire recycling fee.
9–274.
(a) The State Used Tire Cleanup and Recycling Fund shall consist of moneys
made available under:
(1) Loan authorizations;
(2) Funds appropriated in the State budget;
(3) Fees collected for the sale of tires by retail dealers under § 9–228(g) of
this subtitle; or
(4) Bond and security forfeitures collected under § 9–228(k) of this subtitle.
(b) (1) The Fund is limited to a maximum of $10,000,000.
(2) If the sum of unallocated funds in the Fund and the projected fees for
the next fiscal year exceeds $10,000,000, the [Board of Public Works] DEPARTMENT shall
adjust the fees for the next fiscal year on a pro rata basis so that the sum of unallocated
and actual fees does not exceed $10,000,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.